test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_manudas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - mánudâš:
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Nom:  mánudâš
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Gen:  mánudáá
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Acc:  mánudáá
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Ill:  mánudâžân
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Loc:  mánudáást
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Com:  mánudáin
    mánudâš+N+Sg+Abe:  mánudááttáá
    mánudâš+N+Ess:  mánudâžžân
    mánudâš+N+Par:  mánudâžžâd
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Nom:  mánudááh
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Gen:  mánudái
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Acc:  mánudáid
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Ill:  mánudáid
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Loc:  mánudáin
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Com:  [mánudáiguin, mánudáigijn]
    mánudâš+N+Pl+Abe:  mánudáittáá

  Noun - enemdâš:
    emedâš+N+Sg+Nom:  emedâš
    emedâš+N+Sg+Gen:  emedáá
    emedâš+N+Sg+Acc:  emedáá
    emedâš+N+Sg+Ill:  emedâžân
    emedâš+N+Sg+Loc:  emedáást
    emedâš+N+Sg+Com:  emedáin
    emedâš+N+Sg+Abe:  emedááttáá
    emedâš+N+Ess:  emedâžžân
    emedâš+N+Par:  emedâžžâd
    emedâš+N+Pl+Nom:  emedááh
    emedâš+N+Pl+Gen:  emedái
    emedâš+N+Pl+Acc:  emedáid
    emedâš+N+Pl+Ill:  emedáid
    emedâš+N+Pl+Loc:  emedáin
    emedâš+N+Pl+Com:  [emedáiguin, emedáigijn]
    emedâš+N+Pl+Abe:  emedáittáá
